Maine, session 132, LD38.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 21-A MRSA §671, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2019, c. 371, §20, is further
amended to read:
1. Name announced; photograph identification. A voter who wishes to vote must
present proof of identity in the form of a photograph identification document and state the
voter's name and residence address to an election clerk, who shall announce the name in a
loud, clear voice. If the voter's stated residence address is different from the residence
address listed on the incoming voting list, the voter must be directed to complete an updated
voter registration application before voting.
Sec. 2. 21-A MRSA §671, sub-§9 is enacted to read:
9. Special voter photograph identification card. Notwithstanding subsection 1, a
voter who wishes to vote and who does not possess a photograph identification document
may request from the Secretary of State a special voter photograph identification card,
which must be issued free of charge and is valid for voter identification under this section.
The Secretary of State shall establish procedures through rulemaking for the issuance of
special voter photograph identification cards under this subsection. Rules adopted pursuant
to this subsection are routine technical rules under Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
Sec. 3. 21-A MRSA §671, as amended by PL 2021, c. 750, §9 and affected by
§14, is further amended by enacting at the end a new paragraph to read:
For purposes of this section, "photograph identification document" means a current and
valid driver's license or nondriver identification card issued in this State, a United States
passport, a military identification or a permit to carry a concealed handgun issued under
Title 25, chapter 252 if that permit includes a photograph. "Photograph identification
document" does not include an identification issued by a college or university.
Sec. 4. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 1, 2026.